Indiana, session 2026, HB1166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-5-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 2.5. Manner of Conducting Elections in Indiana
Sec. 0.5. (a) This chapter applies notwithstanding any other law.
(b) If there is a conflict between a provision of this chapter and
another provision of Indiana law, this chapter prevails.
Sec. 1. The state of Indiana shall conduct all elections using
secure, hand-marked paper ballots that are:
(1) designed and made in Indiana;
(2) embellished with a distinctive watermark, as designated by
the secretary of state; and
(3) serialized numerically.
No other method of voting may be used in Indiana.
Sec. 2. (a) The watermarked and serialized paper ballots
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


described in section 1 of this chapter must be counted by hand
beginning at 7 a.m. on election day.
(b) Mail-in ballots must be opened at the precinct polling place
and counted at noon on election day in the manner set forth in
IC 3-11.5-5.
Sec. 3. (a) Except as specifically authorized by this chapter,
machines or electronic devices are prohibited in a precinct polling
place.
(b) Each polling place must have video cameras that record and
live stream, with audio and video of the polling place, in full view
of the watchers, the:
(1) hand counting process of the paper ballots; and
(2) transparent ballot box container into which voters place
their folded marked ballots.
(c) Each precinct must have one (1) voting system equipped for
individuals with disabilities to comply with the requirements of
HAVA.
Sec. 4. (a) Ballots must be counted by two (2) counters in
accordance with IC 3-12-2.
(b) The video cameras required under section 3(b) of this
chapter must clearly show the counting of ballots so that watchers
in the polling place have full access to the live stream of all ballots
being hand-counted. The video cameras shall record each
serialized ballot being hand-counted on the tally sheet in full view,
with audio of the caller, to confirm the votes for each candidate or
public question that is called.
Sec. 5. The hand-counted precinct results must be affirmed by
all precinct workers present. All precinct workers shall sign, under
the penalties for perjury, the precinct final tally records.
Sec. 6. (a) The results of the election must be called in to the
county election board, with all precinct workers present. The
county election board shall report the results of the election to the
county clerk for certification.
(b) Copies of final tally reports must be given to each of the
precinct workers as part of the transparency of their work.
(c) Precinct workers may validate reported results from the
county clerk on the election summary report uploaded by precinct
to the county clerk website.
Sec. 7. Election results must be announced the evening of the
election.
Sec. 8. The use of pollbooks in any form other than paper is
prohibited.
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


Sec. 9. (a) Ballots may not contain confidential voter
information. The serial number of the ballot may not allow an
individual to identify a voter.
(b) Ballots are not confidential in Indiana.
Sec. 10. (a) Except as provided in subsection (c), after June 30,
2026, the state may not conduct VSTOP.
(b) On July 1, 2026, the secretary of state shall transfer all funds
for VSTOP to the treasurer of state for deposit in the state general
fund.
(c) This subsection applies if the state has outstanding
contractual obligations under VSTOP after June 30, 2026. When
all contractual obligations under VSTOP are satisfied, the state
may no longer conduct VSTOP.
Sec. 11. (a) The following must be maintained in secure county
owned facilities with restricted access:
(1) Indiana election forms.
(2) Ballots.
(3) Paper pollbooks.
(4) Audio and visual media from the hand counting process.
(5) All other required election related materials.
(b) Except as otherwise required by law, only the county clerk,
together with a member of the opposing political party, may access
ballots maintained under subsection (a).
(c) The secretary of state shall randomly choose ten (10)
counties for post-election hand recounts and inspections of secured
storage facilities.
Sec. 12. (a) All citizens of Indiana have the right to inspect and
copy all election materials at the office of the county clerk,
including the following:
(1) Voter lists.
(2) Pollbook signatures.
(3) Voter history.
(4) Absentee applications.
(5) Absentee ballot signatures.
(6) Chain of custody documentation.
(7) All ballots, excluding the names and addresses of those
participating in the confidential address program.
(b) Inspection and copying under subsection (a) must be
supervised, monitored, and controlled.
Sec. 13. (a) The secretary of state shall establish and maintain
a statewide voter registration data base administered by the
election division and archived in the office of the secretary of state.
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


(b) The data base described in subsection (a) must be made
continuously available to the citizens of Indiana through the
secretary of state's website without cost to the citizen.
(c) The data base described in subsection (a) must be monthly
reconciled against:
(1) the National Change of Address system;
(2) the United States Social Security death index;
(3) noncitizen data bases, such as the Systematic Alien
Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) program; and
(4) any data base that the secretary of state deems useful in
voter roll maintenance;
to ensure all persons on the voter registration lists are eligible to
vote in Indiana.
(d) The secretary of state shall administer voter registration
rolls. The secretary of state may not delegate this function.
Sec. 14. (a) County clerks shall create and print the paper
pollbook for each precinct using the county's official list of
registered voters.
(b) The county clerk shall send any new, edited, or removed
voters from the county's official list by facsimile to the election
division for updating.
(c) The county shall maintain a back up paper copy of the
county's official list, printed once each year. The county clerk shall
also maintain an electronic back up copy of the county's official
list, transferred once each month to a thumb drive that must be
stored securely with the election materials.
Sec. 15. The state's voter registration application must require
an applicant to give permission to the state, if the application is
approved, to inform any other state where the applicant is still
registered to vote, for the purpose of removing the applicant from
the voter registration rolls in the other state. The county clerk shall
send a form to the voter to forward to the voter's former state to
cancel the voter's registration.
Sec. 16. Each day, the election division shall:
(1) create a daily record of the election division's voter
registration data base, as of 4 p.m.; and
(2) transmit, in a secure manner, the daily record to the
secretary of state for:
(A) archive purposes; and
(B) uploading online each day for citizens.
Sec. 17. (a) An election in Indiana may be held only on election
day.
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


(b) Early in person voting is prohibited.
(c) Vote centers are prohibited.
(d) Internet voting is prohibited.
Sec. 18. A precinct may contain not more than one thousand five
hundred (1,500) registered active voters.
Sec. 19. Mass mail-in voting is prohibited. Notwithstanding this
section, a voter may vote by absentee ballot if the ballot is
individually requested by the voter and the voter is permitted to
vote by absentee ballot under section 26 of this chapter.
Sec. 20. Ballot harvesting is prohibited. Only a voter or an
immediate family member of a voter may return a completed
absentee ballot to the county clerk.
Sec. 21. Absentee voter boards may be used for all voters at
extended care facilities. However, an employee at an extended care
facility may not assist a voter in completing a ballot unless the
voter is the employee's immediate family member.
Sec. 22. (a) All voter registration applications must include
proof of citizenship and a signature of the applicant.
(b) A signature submitted under subsection (a) must be used to
verify future voting:
(1) at precinct check in; or
(2) for a voter who votes:
(A) by absentee mail-in ballot; or
(B) as an absent uniformed services voter or overseas
voter.
The requirements under this subsection apply to, but are not
limited to, an envelope containing an absentee ballot.
Sec. 23. A third party organization may not:
(1) request a voter registration;
(2) fill out or mail a registration form for an applicant;
(3) return a registration form to a county official or to the
secretary of state by hand; or
(4) offer any monetary or nonmonetary enticement to request,
fill out, or return a registration form.
Sec. 24. A digital identification is not acceptable for the
purposes of registration or voting.
Sec. 25. A ballot drop box, whether manned or unmanned, is
prohibited in any location.
Sec. 26. (a) An absentee ballot application may not be sent by
mail unless the application is requested.
(b) Absentee ballots must be received by noon on election day.
All absentee ballots received after noon on election day are void
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


and may not be counted.
(c) An absentee ballot may be mailed only to an individual who
requests an absentee ballot.
(d) The following individuals qualify to receive an absentee
ballot:
(1) A member of the military.
(2) An individual with a disability.
(3) A voter who is required to work for the entire time the
polls are open.
(4) An absent uniformed services voter or overseas voter.
(5) An elderly voter who is at least sixty-five (65) years of age.
(e) Mailing an absentee ballot to an individual who is not
described in subsection (d) is prohibited.
(f) An absentee ballot must include a copy of:
(1) the voter's proof of identification; or
(2) the last four (4) digits of the voter's Social Security
number.
Information submitted under this subsection must be verified by
the county clerk from the voter's original registration record and
signature. This section also applies to an absent uniformed services
voter or overseas voter.
Sec. 27. (a) A person who violates this chapter commits voter
fraud, a Class A misdemeanor.
(b) Notwithstanding IC 3-7-13-4, IC 3-7-13-5, and IC 3-7-13-6,
a person who violates this chapter is deprived of the right of
suffrage by the general assembly for a period of ten (10) years
following the date of conviction, pursuant to Article 2, Section 8 of
the Constitution of the State of Indiana.
(c) A person described in subsection (b) is not:
(1) authorized to vote; or
(2) eligible to register under this article;
during the period within which the person is deprived of the right
of suffrage, even if the person is no longer in prison or otherwise
subject to lawful detention.
(d) The reduction of a felony to a misdemeanor does not affect
the operation of subsections (b) and (c).
(e) A person described in subsection (b) who is otherwise
qualified to register under IC 3-7 is eligible to register after the
expiration of the period within which the person is deprived of the
right of suffrage.
SECTION 2. IC 3-7-13-4 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 4. (a) A person who is:
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


(1) convicted of a crime; and
(2) imprisoned following conviction;
is deprived of the right of suffrage by the general assembly pursuant to
Article 2, Section 8 of the Constitution of the State of Indiana.
(b) Except as provided in IC 3-5-2.5-27, a person described in
subsection (a) is ineligible to register under this article during the
period that the person is:
(1) imprisoned; or
(2) otherwise subject to lawful detention.
SECTION 3. IC 3-7-13-6 IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 6. (a) This section applies to a
person who is:
(1) otherwise qualified to register under this article; and
(2) not imprisoned or subject to lawful detention.
(b) Except as provided in IC 3-5-2.5-27, a person described in
subsection (a) who is:
(1) on probation;
(2) on parole;
(3) subject to home detention under IC 35-38-2.5; or
(4) placed in a community corrections program under
IC 35-38-2.6;
is eligible to register and to vote.
SECTION 4. IC 3-7-46-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.128-2015,
SECTION 140, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 1. As permitted under 52
U.S.C. 20507(a)(3)(B) and in the manner required under 52 U.S.C.
21083, a county voter registration office shall remove from the official
list of registered voters the name of a voter who is disfranchised under:
(1) this chapter; or
(2) IC 3-5-2.5-27;
due to a criminal conviction.
SECTION 5. IC 3-11-16-6 IS REPEALED [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]. Sec. 6. The inventory of voting systems and electronic poll
books maintained by VSTOP under section 4 of this chapter is
confidential.
SECTION 6. IC 4-6-17 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE UPON
PASSAGE]:
Chapter 17. Election Crimes Unit
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "ECU" refers to the election
crimes unit established under section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. The attorney general shall establish an election crimes
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144


unit.
Sec. 3. The ECU shall receive, review, and investigate any notice
or report of an election law violation.
Sec. 4. The ECU may independently initiate an investigation
concerning election law violations.
Sec. 5. The ECU has jurisdiction throughout Indiana.
Sec. 6. The secretary of state and the election division shall
permit the ECU access to all data maintained by the secretary of
state and the election division for the ECU's evaluation and review.
Sec. 7. The attorney general shall appoint a director of the ECU.
Sec. 8. The ECU shall create and oversee an Indiana voter fraud
hotline.
Sec. 9. The creation of the ECU does not limit the jurisdiction of
any other office or agency to investigate voter fraud.
Sec. 10. The ECU shall submit an annual report to the governor
and the general assembly containing a summary of all of the ECU's
investigations. The report must be made available to the public. A
report to the general assembly under this section must be in an
electronic format under IC 5-14-6.
SECTION 7. IC 35-52-3-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
UPON PASSAGE]: Sec. 0.5. IC 3-5-2.5-27 defines a crime
concerning elections.
SECTION 8. An emergency is declared for this act.
2026 IN 1166—LS 6679/DI 144